Utah statutes.
11-46-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Animal" means a cat or dog.

(2)  "Animal control officer" means any person employed or appointed by a county or a municipality who is authorized to investigate violations of laws and ordinances concerning animals, to issue citations in accordance with Utah law, and take custody of animals as appropriate in the enforcement of the laws and ordinances.

(3)  "Animal shelter" means a facility or program:

(a)  providing services for stray, lost, or unwanted animals, including holding and placing the animals for adoption, but does not include an institution conducting research on animals, as defined in Section 26-26-1; or

(b)  a private humane society or private animal welfare organization.

(4)  "Person" means an individual, an entity, or a representative of an entity.



Enacted by Chapter 130, 2011 General Session

